Connecticut, session 2026, SB00449.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 10-265u of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(d) On [March] April first of each year, the Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management shall notify each public school operator of the
amount allocated to such public school operator pursuant to subsections
(b) and (c) of this section and shall post on said office's Internet web site
such allocation amounts and the calculations for all public school
operators.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective from passage and applicable to assessment years
commencing on or after October 1, 2026) (a) Notwithstanding the
provisions of sections 12-107a to 12-107e, inclusive, 12-107g, 12-504e and
12-504f of the general statutes, any special act, municipal charter or
ordinance, the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall
collaborate with each state agency having custody or control of real
property belonging to or held in trust for the state, to identify all such

Substitute Senate Bill No. 449
real property that is farm land, forest land, open space land or maritime
heritage land, as those terms are defined in section 12-107b of the
general statutes. Upon making any such identification, the secretary
shall notify the assessor of the municipality in which such land is
located, in whole or in part, that such land has been identified as farm
land, forest land, open space land or maritime heritage land, as
applicable. The secretary shall make such notification not earlier than
thirty days before or later than thirty days after the assessment date in
any year, except that in a year in which a revaluation is required
pursuant to section 12-62 of the general statutes, such notification may
be made not later than ninety days after such assessment date. Upon
receipt of such notification, the assessor shall (1) classify such property
accordingly, (2) value such property in accordance with the schedules
of unit prices developed pursuant to section 12-2b of the general
statutes, and (3) add such property to the grand list of the municipality
in the manner described in section 12-109 of the general statutes.
(b) Any classification of property as farm land, forest land, open
space land or maritime heritage land pursuant to this section shall be
deemed personal to the state and shall not run with the land. Any such
property that has been so classified shall remain so classified without
additional notification to the municipal assessor until (1) the use of such
property is changed to a use other than that identified by the secretary
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or (2) such property is sold or
transferred.
Sec. 3. Section 8-3j of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
[(a)] No zoning regulation shall treat any family child care home or
group child care home, located in a residence and licensed by the Office
of Early Childhood pursuant to chapter 368a, in a manner different from
single or multifamily dwellings.
Public Act No. 26-137 2 of 4

Substitute Senate Bill No. 449
[(b) Not later than December 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, each
municipality shall submit to the Office of Policy and Management a
sworn statement from the chief executive officer of the municipality
stating (1) that the municipality's zoning ordinances are in compliance
with (A) subsection (a) of this section, and (B) the provisions of
subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of section 8-2, or (2) the specific time
frame within which the municipality will bring its zoning ordinances
into compliance with subsection (a) of this section and subsection (d) of
section 8-2.]
Sec. 4. Subsection (b) of section 4-124s of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) There is established a regional performance incentive program
that shall be administered by the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management. Any regional council of governments, regional
educational service center or a combination thereof may submit a
proposal to the secretary for: (1) The provision of any service that two
or more participating municipalities of such council or local or regional
board of education of such regional educational service center may
provide on a regional and ongoing basis, (2) the redistribution of grants
awarded pursuant to sections 4-66g, 4-66h [, 4-66m] and 7-536,
according to regional priorities, or (3) regional revenue sharing among
such participating municipalities pursuant to section 7-148bb. A copy of
said proposal shall be sent to the legislators representing said
participating municipalities or local or regional boards of education.
Any regional educational service center serving a population greater
than one hundred thousand may submit a proposal to the secretary for
a regional special education initiative.
Sec. 5. Section 4-66m of the general statutes is repealed. (Effective
October 1, 2026)
Public Act No. 26-137 3 of 4

Substitute Senate Bill No. 449
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-137 4 of 4